Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 292.406 is amended to read:
292.406. (1)(a) The annual salary of the Chief Judge of the Court of Appeals shall  be $154,040
for the period beginning on January 1, 2019, and ending on June 30, 2020.
(b) On July 1, 2020, the annual salary of the Chief Judge of the  Court of Appeals, as adjusted
under ORS 292.428, shall be increased by $5,000.
(c) On July 1, 2025, the annual salary of the Chief Judge of the  Court of Appeals shall be
$220,596.
(d) On July 1, 2027, the annual salary of  the Chief Judge of the Court of Appeals shall
be 110 percent of the salary specified in paragraph (c) of this subsection, as  adjusted under
ORS 292.428.
(2)(a) The annual salary of each other judge of the Court  of Appeals shall be $150,980 for the
period beginning on January 1, 2019, and ending on June 30, 2020.
(b) On July 1, 2020, the annual salary of each other  judge of the Court of Appeals, as adjusted
under ORS 292.428, shall be increased by $5,000.
(c) On July 1, 2025, the annual salary of each  other judge of the Court of Appeals shall
be $216,336.
(d) On July 1, 2027, the annual salary of each  other judge of the Court of Appeals shall
be 110 percent  of the salary specified in paragraph (c) of this subsection, as adjusted under
ORS 292.428.
SECTION 2.  ORS 292.411 is amended to read:
292.411. (1)(a) The annual salary of  the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court shall be $157,076 for
the period beginning on January 1, 2019, and ending on June 30, 2020.
(b) On July 1, 2020, the annual salary of the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court,  as adjusted
under ORS 292.428, shall be increased by $5,000.
(c) On  July 1, 2025, the annual salary of the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court shall be
$224,784.
(d) On July 1, 2027, the annual salary of the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court shall be
110 percent of the salary specified in paragraph (c) of this subsection, as adjusted  under ORS
292.428.
Enrolled House Bill 2712 (HB 2712-B) Page 1
(2)(a) The annual salary of each other judge of the Supreme Court shall be  $154,040 for the pe-
riod beginning on January 1, 2019, and ending on June 30, 2020.
(b) On July 1, 2020, the  annual salary of each other judge of the Supreme Court, as adjusted
under ORS 292.428, shall be increased by $5,000.
(c) On July 1, 2025, the annual salary of each other judge of  the Supreme Court shall be
$220,596.
(d) On July 1, 2027,  the annual salary of each other judge of the Supreme Court shall be
110 percent of the salary specified in subsection (3) of this section, as adjusted  under ORS
292.428.
SECTION 3.  ORS 292.416 is amended to read:
292.416. (1) The  annual salary of each judge of a circuit court shall be $142,136 for the period
beginning on January 1, 2019, and ending on June 30, 2020.
(2) On July 1, 2020, the annual salary of each judge of a circuit court, as adjusted  under ORS
292.428, shall be increased by $5,000.
(3) On July 1, 2025, the annual salary of each judge of a circuit court shall be $204,060.
(4) On July 1, 2027, the annual salary of each judge of a circuit court shall be 110 percent
of the salary specified in subsection (3) of this section, as adjusted under ORS 292.428.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 292.426 is amended to read:
292.426. (1) The annual salary of the judge of the Oregon Tax Court shall be  $146,048 for the
period beginning on January 1, 2019, and ending on June 30, 2020.
(2) On July 1, 2020, the annual salary of the judge of the Oregon  Tax Court, as adjusted under
ORS 292.428, shall be increased by $5,000.
(3) On July 1, 2025, the annual salary of the judge  of the Oregon Tax Court shall be
$209,532.
(4) On July 1, 2027, the annual salary of the judge of the Oregon Tax Court shall be 110
percent of the salary specified in subsection (3) of this  section, as adjusted under ORS
292.428.
SECTION 5. (1) In the exercise of administrative authority and supervision over the
courts of this state,  the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court has the authority to take actions
and establish rules that promote  judicial accountability and fair and accessible justice ser-
vices, consistent with the mission of the state courts, including the ability to establish:
(a) Judicial education requirements to strengthen the skills, resilience and  performance
of the members of the Judicial Conference of the State of Oregon;
(b) An ombudsman’s office within  the office of the State Court Administrator to receive
and respond to comments and concerns regarding court experiences;
(c) Rules and  standards governing the resolution of concerns regarding judicial per-
formance;
(d) Individualized action plans applicable to  judges, including mandatory plans of educa-
tion, coaching or mentoring; and
(e) Rules regarding  the availability or confidentiality of information obtained or gener-
ated by the ombudsman’s office.
(2) Nothing in this section prevents the Chief Justice or any other individual from re-
ferring a matter to the Commission on Judicial Fitness and Disability.
SECTION 6. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Judicial  Department by section 1 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled
House Bill 5012), for the biennium beginning July  1, 2025, for judicial compensation, is in-
creased by $11,328,430 for implementation  of the amendments to ORS 292.406, 292.411, 292.416
and 292.426 by sections 1 to 4 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 7. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Judicial  Department by section 1 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled
House Bill 5012), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, for operations, is increased by
$1,909,655 for implementation of the provisions of section 5 of this 2025 Act.
Enrolled House Bill 2712 (HB 2712-B) Page 2
SECTION 8. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House June 23, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 24, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2712 (HB 2712-B) Page 3